Hawaii statutes.
§612-53 Grand jury counsel; length of term;
extension of term; limitation on reappointment. (a) Grand jury counsel
shall serve for a term of one year following appointment.

(b) The term of a grand jury counsel may be
extended when the matters for which the counsel was called to service cannot be
completed before the end of the counsel's term. The extension shall be
authorized by the chief justice where completion of such matters would be
substantially extended or hindered by the assignment of another counsel.

(c) In no case shall grand jury counsel be
reappointed to serve consecutive terms.

(d) The term of the grand jury counsel
whenever practicable shall be such that it will not be coterminous with the
term of the grand jury. [L 1980, c 209, §4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next